Arkansas, session 2025, SB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Capitol Zoning District
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G155C ADPHT PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(2) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(3) X106C ADPHT CZDC PLANNING/PRESERV COORD 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3
*WFP014*
01/14/2025 8:31:08 AM WFP014

SB65

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Capitol Zoning District Commission for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time employee, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Capitol Zoning
District Commission - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $176,446
(02) EXTRA HELP 938
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 63,700
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,956
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $257,040

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Capitol Zoning District
Commission - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
01/14/2025 8:31:08 AM WFP014

SB65
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/14/2025 8:31:08 AM WFP014

SB65
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/14/2025 8:31:08 AM WFP014